California statutes. Insurance Code
 or postmarked within the first 15 days of any subsequent month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the following month. When that payment is delivered or postmarked between December 16, 2013, to December 31, 2013, inclusive, or after the 15th day of any subsequent month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the second month following delivery or postmark of the payment.

(3) With respect to an individual health benefit plan for which an individual applies during the annual open enrollment period described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), when the individual submits a premium payment, based on the quoted premium charges, and that payment is delivered or postmarked, whichever occurs later, by December 15 of the preceding calendar year, coverage shall become effective on January 1 of the
 benefit year. When that payment is delivered or postmarked within the first 15 days of any subsequent month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the following month. When that payment is delivered or postmarked between December 16 to December 31, inclusive, or after the 15th day of any subsequent month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the second month following delivery or postmark of the payment.

(4) With respect to an individual health benefit plan for which an individual applies during a special enrollment period described in subdivision (d), the following provisions shall apply:

(A) When the individual submits a premium payment, based on the quoted premium charges, and that payment is delivered or postmarked,
 whichever occurs earlier, within the first 15 days of the month, coverage under the plan shall become effective no later than the first day of the following month. When the premium payment is neither delivered nor postmarked until after the 15th day of the month, coverage shall become effective no later than the first day of the second month following delivery or postmark of the payment.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in the case of a birth, adoption, or placement for adoption, the coverage shall be effective on the date of birth, adoption, or placement for adoption.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in the case of marriage or becoming a registered domestic partner or in the case where a qualified individual loses minimum essential coverage, the coverage effective
 date shall be the first day of the month following the date the insurer receives the request for special enrollment.

(g) (1) A health insurer shall not establish rules for eligibility, including continued eligibility, of any individual to enroll under the terms of an individual health benefit plan based on any of the following factors:

(A) Health status.

(B) Medical condition, including physical and mental illnesses.

(C) Claims experience.

(D) Receipt of health care.

(E) Medical history.

(F) Genetic information.

(G) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence.

(H) Disability.

(I) Any other health status-related factor as determined by any federal regulations, rules, or guidance issued pursuant to Section 2705 of the federal Public Health Service Act (Public Law 78-410).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 10291.5, a health insurer shall not require an individual applicant or the applicant’s dependent to fill out a health assessment or medical questionnaire prior to enrollment under an individual health benefit plan. A health insurer shall not acquire or request information that
 relates to a health status-related factor from the applicant or the applicant’s dependent or any other source prior to enrollment of the individual.

(h) (1) A health insurer shall consider as a single risk pool for rating purposes in the individual market the claims experience of all insureds and enrollees in all nongrandfathered individual health benefit plans offered by that insurer in this state, whether offered as health care service plan contracts or individual health insurance policies, including those insureds and enrollees who enroll in individual coverage through the Exchange and insureds and enrollees who enroll in individual coverage outside the Exchange. Student health insurance coverage, as such coverage is defined in Section 147.145(a) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, shall not be included in
 a health insurer’s single risk pool for individual coverage.

(2) Each calendar year, a health insurer shall establish an index rate for the individual market in the state based on the total combined claims costs for providing essential health benefits, as defined pursuant to Section 1302 of PPACA, within the single risk pool required under paragraph (1). The index rate shall be adjusted on a marketwide basis based on the total expected marketwide payments and charges under the risk adjustment program established for the state pursuant to Section 1343 of PPACA and Exchange user fees, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 156.80 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The premium rate for all of the health benefit plans in the individual market within the single risk pool required under paragraph (1) shall use the applicable
 marketwide adjusted index rate, subject only to the adjustments permitted under paragraph (3).

(3) A health insurer may vary premium rates for a particular health benefit plan from its index rate based only on the following actuarially justified plan-specific factors:

(A) The actuarial value and cost-sharing design of the health benefit plan.

(B) The health benefit plan’s provider network, delivery system characteristics, and utilization management practices.

(C) The benefits provided under the health benefit plan that are in addition to the essential health benefits, as defined pursuant to Section 1302 of PPACA and Section 10112.27. These additional benefits
 shall be pooled with similar benefits within the single risk pool required under paragraph (1) and the claims experience from those benefits shall be utilized to determine rate variations for plans that offer those benefits in addition to essential health benefits.

(D) With respect to catastrophic plans, as described in subsection (e) of Section 1302 of PPACA, the expected impact of the specific eligibility categories for those plans.

(E) Administrative costs, excluding any user fees required by the Exchange.

(i) This section shall only apply with respect to individual health benefit plans for policy years on or after January 1, 2014.

(j) This section shall
 not apply to a grandfathered health plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 764, Sec. 11.   (SB 326)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.4.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10965.3, with respect to individual health benefit plans offered outside of the Exchange, a health insurer shall provide an annual enrollment period for policy years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, from November 1 of the preceding calendar year, to January 31 of the benefit year, inclusive.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10965.3, with respect to individual health benefit plans offered through the Exchange, for policy years beginning on or after January 1, 2023, a health insurer shall provide an annual enrollment period from November 1 of the preceding calendar year
 to January 31 of the benefit year, inclusive.

(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10965.3, with respect to individual health benefit plans offered outside and through the Exchange, the effective date of coverage shall be as follows:

(1) No later than January 1 of the benefit year for plan selection made from November 1 to December 31 of the preceding calendar year, inclusive.

(2) No later than February 1 of the benefit year for plan selection made from January 1 to January 31 of the benefit year, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 545, Sec. 6.   (SB 1473)   Effective September 25, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.5.

(a) Commencing on October 1, 2013, a health insurer or agent or broker shall not, directly or indirectly, engage in the following activities:

(1) Encourage or direct an individual to refrain from filing an application for individual coverage with an insurer because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location, provided that the location is within the insurer’s approved service area, of the individual.

(2) Encourage or direct an individual to seek individual coverage from another health care service plan or health insurer or the California Health Benefit Exchange because of the health status,
 claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location, provided that the location is within the insurer’s approved service area, of the individual.

(3) Employ marketing practices or benefit designs that will have the effect of discouraging the enrollment of individuals with significant health needs or discriminate based on an individual’s race, color, national origin, present or predicted disability, age, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, expected length of life, degree of medical dependency, quality of life, or other health conditions.

(b) Commencing on October 1, 2013, a health insurer shall not, directly or indirectly, enter into any contract, agreement, or arrangement with a broker or agent that provides for or results in the compensation paid to a broker or agent for the sale of an individual health benefit plan to be varied because of the health status,
 claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic location of the individual. This subdivision does not apply to a compensation arrangement that provides compensation to a broker or agent on the basis of percentage of premium, provided that the percentage shall not vary because of the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation, or geographic area of the individual.

(c) This section shall only apply with respect to individual health benefit plans for policy years on or after January 1, 2014.

(d) This section shall be enforced in the same manner as Section 790.03, including through Sections 790.05 and 790.035.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.7.

(a) An individual health benefit plan shall be renewable at the option of the insured except as permitted to be canceled, rescinded, or not renewed pursuant to Section 155.430(b) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) Any insurer that ceases to offer for sale new individual health benefit plans pursuant to Section 10273.6 shall continue to be governed by this chapter with respect to business conducted under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.9.

(a) With respect to individual health benefit plans issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, a health insurer may use only the following characteristics of an individual, and any dependent thereof, for purposes of establishing the rate of the individual health benefit plan covering the individual and the eligible dependents thereof, along with the health benefit plan selected by the individual:

(1) Age, pursuant to the age bands established by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services and the age rating curve established by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 2701(a)(3) of the federal Public Health Service Act
 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg(a)(3)). Rates based on age shall be determined using the individual’s age as of the date of the plan issuance or renewal, as applicable, and shall not vary by more than three to one for like individuals of different ages who are 21 years of age or older as described in federal regulations adopted pursuant to Section 2701(a)(3) of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg(a)(3)).

(2) (A) Geographic region. The geographic regions for purposes of rating shall be the following:

(i) Region 1 shall consist of the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Del Norte, Glenn, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen, Mendocino, Modoc, Nevada, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Tuolumne, and Yuba.

(ii) Region 2 shall consist of the Counties of Marin, Napa, Solano, and Sonoma.

(iii) Region 3 shall consist of the Counties of El Dorado, Placer, Sacramento, and Yolo.

(iv) Region 4 shall consist of the City and County of San Francisco.

(v) Region 5 shall consist of the County of Contra Costa.

(vi) Region 6 shall consist of the County of Alameda.

(vii) Region 7 shall consist of the County of Santa Clara.

(viii) Region 8 shall consist of the County of San Mateo.

(ix) Region 9 shall consist of the Counties of Monterey, San Benito, and Santa Cruz.

(x) Region 10 shall consist of the Counties of Mariposa, Merced, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, and Tulare.

(xi) Region 11 shall consist of the Counties of Fresno, Kings, and Madera.

(xii) Region 12 shall consist of the Counties of San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, and Ventura.

(xiii) Region 13 shall consist of the Counties of Imperial, Inyo, and Mono.

(xiv) Region 14 shall consist of the County of Kern.

(xv) Region 15 shall consist of the ZIP Codes in the County of Los Angeles starting with 906 to 912, inclusive, 915, 917, 918, and 935.

(xvi) Region 16 shall consist of the ZIP Codes in the County of Los Angeles other than those identified in clause (xv).

(xvii) Region 17 shall consist of the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino.

(xviii) Region 18 shall consist of the County of Orange.

(xix) Region 19 shall consist of the County of San Diego.

(B) No later than June 1, 2017, the department, in collaboration with the Exchange and the Department of Managed Health Care, shall review the
 geographic rating regions specified in this paragraph and the impacts of those regions on the health care coverage market in California, and make a report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(3) Whether the plan covers an individual or family, as described in PPACA.

(b) The rate for a health benefit plan subject to this section shall not vary by any factor not described in this section.

(c) With respect to family coverage under an individual health benefit plan, the rating variation permitted under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be applied based on the portion of the premium attributable to each family member covered under the plan. The total premium for family coverage shall be determined by
 summing the premiums for each individual family member. In determining the total premium for family members, premiums for no more than the three oldest family members who are under 21 years of age shall be taken into account.

(d) The rating period for rates subject to this section shall be from January 1 to December 31, inclusive.

(e) This section shall not apply to an individual health benefit plan that is a grandfathered health plan.

(f) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is inoperative on June 1, 2021, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 764, Sec. 12.   (SB 326)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.11.

(a) A health insurer shall not be required to offer an individual health benefit plan or accept applications for the plan pursuant to Section 10965.3 in the case of any of the following:

(1) To an individual who does not live or reside within the insurer’s approved service areas.

(2) (A) Within a specific service area or portion of a service area, if the insurer reasonably anticipates and demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner both of the following:

(i) It will not have sufficient health care delivery resources to ensure that health care services will be
 available and accessible to the individual because of its obligations to existing insureds.

(ii) It is applying this subparagraph uniformly to all individuals without regard to the claims experience of those individuals or any health status-related factor relating to those individuals.

(B) A health insurer that cannot offer an individual health benefit plan to individuals because it is lacking in sufficient health care delivery resources within a service area or a portion of a service area pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall not offer an individual health benefit plan in that area until the later of the following dates:

(i) The 181st day after the date coverage is denied pursuant to this paragraph.

(ii) The date the insurer notifies the commissioner that
 it has the ability to deliver services to individuals, and certifies to the commissioner that from the date of the notice it will enroll all individuals requesting coverage in that area from the insurer.

(C) Subparagraph (B) shall not limit the insurer’s ability to renew coverage already in force or relieve the insurer of the responsibility to renew that coverage as described in Section 10273.6.

(D) Coverage offered within a service area after the period specified in subparagraph (B) shall be subject to this section.

(b) (1) A health insurer may decline to offer an individual health benefit plan to an individual if the insurer demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner both of the following:

(A) It does not have the
 financial reserves necessary to underwrite additional coverage. In determining whether this subparagraph has been satisfied, the commissioner shall consider, but not be limited to, the insurer’s compliance with the requirements of this part and the rules adopted thereunder.

(B) It is applying this subdivision uniformly to all individuals without regard to the claims experience of those individuals or any health status-related factor relating to those individuals.

(2) A health insurer that denies coverage to an individual under paragraph (1) shall not offer coverage before the later of the following dates:

(A) The 181st day after the date coverage is denied pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) The date the insurer demonstrates to the satisfaction of the
 commissioner that the insurer has sufficient financial reserves necessary to underwrite additional coverage.

(3) Paragraph (2) shall not limit the insurer’s ability to renew coverage already in force or relieve the insurer of the responsibility to renew that coverage as described in Section 10273.6. Coverage offered within a service area after the period specified in paragraph (2) shall be subject to this section.

(c) This chapter shall not be construed to limit the commissioner’s authority to develop and implement a plan of rehabilitation for a health insurer whose financial viability or organizational and administrative capacity has become impaired, to the extent permitted by PPACA.

(d) This section shall not apply to an individual health benefit plan that is a grandfathered
 plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 105.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.13.

(a) A health insurer that receives an application for an individual health benefit plan outside the Exchange during the initial open enrollment period, an annual enrollment period, or a special enrollment period described in Section 10965.3 shall inform the applicant that he or she may be eligible for lower cost coverage through the Exchange and shall inform the applicant of the applicable enrollment period provided through the Exchange described in Section 10965.3.

(b) On or before October 1, 2013, and annually every October 1 thereafter, a health insurer shall issue a notice to a policyholder enrolled in an individual health benefit plan offered outside the Exchange. The
 notice shall inform the policyholder that he or she may be eligible for lower cost coverage through the Exchange and shall inform the policyholder of the applicable open enrollment period and special enrollment periods provided through the Exchange described in Section 10965.3.

(c) This section shall not apply where the individual health benefit plan described in subdivision (a) or (b) is a grandfathered health plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 468, Sec. 8.   (AB 156)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.15.

(a) On or before October 1, 2013, and annually every October 1 thereafter, a health insurer shall issue the following notice to all policyholders enrolled in an individual health benefit plan that is a grandfathered health plan:
New improved health insurance options are available in California. You currently have health insurance that is not required to follow many of the new laws. For example, your policy may not provide preventive health services without you having to pay any cost sharing (copayments or coinsurance). Also your current policy may be allowed to increase your rates based on your health status while new policies cannot. You have the option to remain in your current policy or switch to a
 new policy. Under the new rules, a health insurance company cannot deny your application based on any health conditions you may have. For more information about your options, please contact Covered California at ____, your policy representative or insurance agent, or an entity paid by Covered California to assist with health coverage enrollment, such as a navigator or an assister.
(b) Commencing October 1, 2013, a health insurer shall include the notice described in subdivision (a) in any renewal material of the individual grandfathered health plan and in any application for dependent coverage under the individual grandfathered health plan.

(c) A health insurer shall not advertise or market an individual health benefit plan that is a grandfathered health plan for purposes of enrolling a dependent of a policyholder into the plan for policy
 years on or after January 1, 2014. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit an individual enrolled in an individual grandfathered health plan from adding a dependent to that plan to the extent permitted by PPACA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 34.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.16.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter shall be implemented to the extent that it meets or exceeds the requirements set forth in PPACA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.17.

(a) The commissioner may, no later than December 31, 2014, adopt emergency regulations implementing this chapter. The commissioner may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as or substantially equivalent to an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.

(b) The initial adoption of emergency regulations implementing this chapter and the one readoption of emergency regulation authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be
 exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than one year, by which time final regulations may be adopted. The commissioner shall consult with the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care prior to adopting any regulations pursuant to this subdivision for the specific purpose of ensuring, to the extent practical, that there is consistency of regulations applicable to entities regulated by the commissioner and those regulated by the Department of Managed Health Care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 19.   (AB 2 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10965.18.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, a bridge plan product shall mean an individual health benefit plan that is offered by a health insurer licensed under this part that contracts with the Exchange pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(b) On and after September 30, 2013, if a health insurance policy has not been filed with the commissioner, a health insurer that contracts with the Exchange to offer a qualified bridge plan product pursuant to Section 100504.5 of the Government Code shall file the policy form with the commissioner pursuant to Section 10290.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 10965.3, a health insurer selling a bridge plan product shall not be required to fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell the health insurer’s bridge plan product except to individuals eligible for the bridge plan product pursuant to the State Department of Health Care Services and the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s contract entered into pursuant to Section 14005.70 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, provided the health care service plan meets the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.70 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 10965.3, a health insurer selling a bridge plan product shall provide an initial open enrollment period of six months, and an annual enrollment period and a special enrollment period consistent
 with the annual enrollment and special enrollment periods of the Exchange.

(d) A health insurer that contracts with the Exchange to offer a qualified bridge plan product pursuant to Section 100504.5 of the Government Code shall maintain a medical loss ratio of 85 percent for the bridge plan product. A health insurer shall utilize, to the extent possible, the same methodology for calculating the medical loss ratio for the bridge plan product that is used for calculating the health insurer’s medical loss ratio pursuant to Section 10112.25 and shall report its medical loss ratio for the bridge plan product to the department as provided in Section 10112.25.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on the October 1 that is five years after the date that federal approval of the bridge plan option
 occurs, and, as of the second January 1 thereafter, is
 repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before that date deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10961 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 8.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Conditionally inoperative, on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on second January 1 after inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Fraternal Benefit Societies [10970. - 11165.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope of Chapter [10970. - 10976.]

10970.

Fraternal benefit societies shall be governed by this chapter and shall be exempt from all other provisions of this code, except:

(a) Those provisions prior to Division 1 entitled “General Provisions.”

(b) Sections 880, 881, 10112, 10114, 10117, 10118, 10119, 10120, 10171, 10172, and 10191.

(c) Article 15 (commencing with Section 1070) and Article 17 (commencing with Section 1100) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(d) Those provisions specifically referred to in this chapter to the extent made necessary by such reference.

A statute relating to insurance shall not apply to them, unless they are expressly designated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10971.

This chapter shall not, except as provided by Sections 10972 and 10974, affect:

(a) A lodge operating under the lodge system, which provides in its bylaws or rules or regulations for the payment of death benefits not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) on the death of a member or for the payment of disability benefits not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) to a member during any period of 12 consecutive calendar months, or both of those types of benefits.

(b) The subordinate branch of a lodge, as a lodge is defined in Section 10972, or any association formed by the members of a lodge, which association confines its membership to the members of such lodge, which subordinate branch or association (1) is organized without capital stock, (2) is organized and operated solely for the benefit of its members or their beneficiaries and not for profit, and (3) provides in its bylaws or rules or regulations for the payment of either or both of the following benefits: (i) a benefit of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) on the death of a member from any cause; (ii) a benefit of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) on the accidental death of a member or benefits not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) during any period of 12 consecutive calendar months to a member for his or her disability.

(c) A lodge operating under the lodge system or any subordinate branch thereof or any association formed by the members thereof which association confines its membership to the members of such lodge, which subordinate branch or association (1) is organized without capital stock, (2) is organized and operated solely for the benefit of its members or their beneficiaries and not for profit, and (3) provides in its bylaws or rules or regulations for the payment of death benefits not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) on the death of a member or for the payment of disability benefits not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) to a member during any period of 12 consecutive calendar months, or both of those types of benefits.

(d) An organization authorized to operate pursuant to a superior court judgment issued between January and April of 1940 whether or not the amount of benefits offered by that organization conforms to that judgment.

(e) Contracts of reinsurance on a plan under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), or (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10972.

(1) A lodge operating under the lodge system, as this term is used in Section 10971, shall have all of the following characteristics:

(a) It is organized without capital stock.

(b) It is organized and operated solely for the benefit of its members or their beneficiaries and not for profit.

(c) It has a lodge system and representative form of government within the meaning of Section 10992, holds regular meetings at periodical intervals, and has a ritualistic form of work, and it has not less than 10 subordinate branches with more than a total of 1,000 dues-paying, active members in good standing.

(2) Any lodge, subordinate branch or association otherwise covered by Section 10971, which issues to any person a policy or certificate providing for the payment of benefits, shall comply with all the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

10973.

The commissioner may require from any society such information as will enable him to determine whether or not such society is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

10974.

A lodge, subordinate branch thereof or association formed by the members thereof which is exempted from the requirements of this chapter by Section 10971 shall not give or allow, nor promise to give or allow, any compensation for procuring new members.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

10975.

Any fraternal benefit society organized and operating within the definition set forth in Sections 10990 to 10992 on July 29, 1911, providing benefits in case of death or disability resulting solely from accidents but not obligating itself to pay death or sick benefits, may obtain a certificate of authority under this chapter. Such society shall have all the privileges and shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter, except those requiring medical examination, valuations of policies, and that the policies specify the amount of benefits.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

10976.

Any incorporated fraternal benefit society engaged on July 29, 1911, in transacting business in this State may exercise all of the rights conferred by this chapter, and all of the rights, powers and privileges not inconsistent with this chapter, which were theretofore exercised or possessed by it under its charter. Any unincorporated fraternal benefit society thus engaged may incorporate hereunder.

A society already incorporated shall not be required to reincorporate hereunder. Any such society may amend its articles of incorporation. All such amendments shall be filed with the commissioner and shall become operative upon such filing, unless a later time is otherwise provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [10990. - 10993.]

10990.

Any incorporated society, order or supreme lodge, without capital stock, conducted solely for the benefit of its members and their beneficiaries and not for profit, operated on a lodge system with ritualistic form of work, having a representative form of government, and which makes provision for the payment of benefits in accordance with this chapter, is hereby declared to be a fraternal benefit society.

When used in this chapter, the word “society,” unless otherwise indicated, shall mean fraternal benefit society.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

10991.

A society having a supreme legislative or governing body and subordinate lodges or branches by whatever name known, into which members are elected, initiated, or admitted in accordance with its constitution, laws, and ritual, which subordinate lodges or branches shall be required by the laws of the society to hold regular meetings at least once a month in furtherance of the purposes of the society, shall be deemed to be operating on the lodge system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10992.

A society shall be deemed to have a representative form of government when:

(a) It provides in its constitution or laws for a supreme legislative or governing body, composed of representatives elected either by the members or by delegates elected directly or indirectly by the members, together with such other members as may be prescribed by the society’s constitution and laws;

(b) The representatives elected constitute a majority in number and have not less than two-thirds of the votes nor less than the votes required to amend its constitution and laws;

(c) The meetings of the supreme legislative or governing body and the election of officers, representatives and delegates, by whatever name known, are held as often as once in four calendar years;

(d) The members, officers, representatives and delegates, by whatever name known, shall not vote by proxy; and

(e) The officers may be elected by the board of directors if the board of directors is itself elected by the supreme legislative or governing body.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------

10993.

Every fraternal benefit society organized or admitted under this chapter is hereby declared to be a charitable and benevolent institution, and all of its funds shall be exempt from all and every state, county, district, municipal and school tax, other than taxes on real estate and office equipment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1193.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Organization [11010. - 11033.]

11010.

Seven or more United States citizens, a majority of whom are citizens of this state, who desire to form a fraternal benefit society, may make, sign, and acknowledge articles of incorporation before an officer competent to take acknowledgment of deeds. The articles of incorporation shall state:

(a) The proposed corporate name of the society, which shall not so closely resemble the name of any society or insurance company as to be misleading or confusing.

(b) The purposes for which it is being formed, and the mode in which its corporate powers are to be exercised.

The purposes shall not include more liberal powers than are granted by this chapter, provided that any lawful, social, intellectual, educational, charitable, benevolent, moral, fraternal, or religious purposes shall be set forth among the purposes of the society.

(c) The names and residences of the incorporators, and the names, residences and official titles of all the officers, trustees, directors, or other persons who are to have and exercise the general control of the management of the affairs and funds of the society for the first year, or until the ensuing election at which all officers shall be elected by the supreme legislative or governing body. The election shall be held within one year of the date of the issuance of the permanent certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.

The articles of incorporation, duly certified copies of the constitution, laws and rules, copies of all proposed forms of certificates, applications therefor, and circulars to be issued by the society, and a bond, conditioned upon the return to applicants of the advanced payments if the organization is not completed within one year, such bond to be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and approved by the commissioner, shall be filed with the commissioner, who may require such further information as the commissioner deems necessary. All documents filed are to be in the English language. If the purposes of the society conform to the requirements of this chapter and all provisions of the law have been complied with, the commissioner shall so certify, retain and file the articles of incorporation and furnish the incorporators a preliminary certificate authorizing the society to solicit members as hereinafter provided. Copies of the articles of incorporation shall also be filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

11012.

No such preliminary certificate shall be valid after one year from its date, or after such further period, not exceeding one year, as may be authorized by the commissioner, upon cause shown, unless the 500 applicants hereinafter required have been secured and the organization has been completed as provided in this article. The articles of incorporation and all other proceedings thereunder shall become null and void in one year from the date of the preliminary certificate, or at the expiration of the extended period, unless the society shall have completed its organization and received a certificate of authority to do business as hereinafter provided.
